Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0253

"Gambling record."

"Gambling record," as used in this chapter, means any record, receipt, ticket, certificate, token, slip or notation given, made, used or intended to be used in connection with professional gambling.

[ 1987 c 4 s 14. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(13).]